District of Columbia statutes.
1-1404

Transfers.

All positions, personnel, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available or to be made available to the Chief Information Officer in the Office of the City Administrator pursuant to § 2-327.01 [repealed], or to the Department of Administrative Services for the information technology and telecommunications purposes and functions set out in Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1983, effective March 1, 1984, are hereby transferred to the Office of the Chief Technology Officer.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1815, 45 DCR 7193

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1195.4.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of §§ 1-1195.1 to 1-1195.5 1981 Ed., see note to § 1-1401.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 11B 1981 Ed., see notes following § 1-1401.